Utah statutes.
63J-1-102.   Definitions.
(1)  "Dedicated credits" means collections by an agency that are deposited
directly into an account for expenditure on a separate line item and program.
(2)  "Federal revenues" means collections by an agency from a federal source
that are deposited into an account for expenditure on a separate line item and
program.
(3)  "Fixed collections" means collections that are:
(a)  fixed at a specific amount by law or by an appropriation act; and
(b)  required to be deposited into a separate line item and program.
(4)  "Free revenue" includes:
(a)  collections that are required by law to be deposited in:
(i)  the General Fund;
(ii)  the Education Fund;
(iii)  the Uniform School Fund; or
(iv)  the Transportation Fund;
(b)  collections that are not otherwise designated by law;
(c)  collections that are not externally restricted; and
(d)  collections that are not included in an approved work program.
(5)  "Major revenue types" means:
(a)  free revenue;
(b)  restricted revenue;
(c)  dedicated credits; and
(d)  fixed collections.
(6)  "Restricted revenue" means collections that are:
(a)  deposited, by law, into a separate fund, subfund, or account; and
(b)  designated for a specific program or purpose.
